hu: Hardver > Szerszám-kiegészítők > Forrasztópáka-kiegészítők: Forrasztópáka-állványok; Forrasztópáka-hegyek
en: Hardware > Tool Accessories > Soldering Iron Accessories: Soldering Iron Stands; Soldering Iron Tips
fi: Rakentaminen > Työkalujen lisätarvikkeet > Juotoskolvin lisätarvikkeet: Juotoskolvin telineet; Juotoskolvin kärjet
ja: DIY用品 > 工具関連用品 > ハンダゴテ関連用品: ハンダゴテ用スタンド; ハンダゴテ用コテ先
it: Articoli di ferramenta > Accessori per attrezzi > Accessori saldatori a stilo: Supporti saldatori a stilo; Punte saldatori a stilo
tr: Hırdavat > Alet Aksesuarları > Havya Aksesuarları: Havya Stantları; Havya Uçları
pt-BR: Ferragens > Acessórios para ferramentas > Acessórios para ferros de solda: Suportes para soldadora elétrica; Pontas para ferros de solda
bg-BG: Железария > Аксесоари за инструменти > Аксесоари за поялник: Стойки за поялник; Накрайници за поялник
ko: 철물 > 공구 부대용품 > 납땜 인두 부대용품: 납땜 인두 거치대; 납땜 인두 팁
es: Bricolaje > Accesorios para herramientas > Accesorios para soldador: Bases para soldador; Puntas para soldador
nb: Maskinvare > Verktøytilbehør > Tilbehør for loddebolter: Stativer for loddebolter; Tupper for loddebolter
de: Heimwerkerbedarf > Werkzeugzubehör > Zubehör für Lötkolben: Lötkolbenständer; Lötkolbenspitzen
sv: Metallprodukter > Verktygstillbehör > Tillbehör till lödkolvar: Lödkolvsställ; Lödkolvsspetsar
ru: Оборудование и технические изделия > Аксессуары для инструментов > Аксессуары для паяльников: Подставки для паяльников; Жала для паяльников
sl-SI: Gradbena oprema > Dodatki za orodje > Dodatki za spajkalnike: Stojala za spajkalnike; Spajkalne konice
ro-RO: Feronerie > Accesorii pentru unelte > Accesorii ciocan de lipit: Suporturi pentru ciocan de lipit; Vârfuri pentru ciocan de lipit
cs: Kutilství a řemeslo > Nástroje a nářadí – příslušenství > Příslušenství k pájkám: Stojan na pájky; Pájecí hroty
vi: Phần cứng > Phụ kiện dụng cụ > Phụ kiện mỏ hàn: Giá đỡ mỏ hàn; Đầu mỏ hàn
pl: Sprzęt > Akcesoria do narzędzi > Akcesoria do lutownic: Stojaki lutownicze; Groty do lutownic
hr-HR: Željezarija > Dodaci za alat > Pribor za lemilice: Stalci za lemilice; Vrhovi za lemilice
sk-SK: Náradie > Náradie a príslušenstvo > Príslušenstvo pre spájkovačky: Stojany pre spájkovačky; Hroty spájkovačiek
nl: Bouwmaterialen > Gereedschapaccessoires > Soldeerboutaccessoires: Standaarden voor soldeerbouten; Soldeerboutpunten
zh-TW: 硬體 > 工具配件 > 烙鐵配件: 烙鐵架; 焊接頭
zh-CN: 五金/硬件 > 工具配件 > 烙铁配件: 烙铁架; 烙铁头
pt-PT: Equipamento > Acessórios de ferramentas > Acessórios de ferro de soldar: Apoios de ferro de soldar; Pontas de ferro de soldar
da: Isenkram > Værktøj – tilbehør > Loddekolbe – tilbehør: Loddekolbe – holdere; Loddespidser
lt-LT: Techninė įranga > Įrankių priedai > Lituoklių priedai: Lituoklių stovai; Lituoklių antgaliai
fr: Quincaillerie > Accessoires d’outils > Accessoires pour fers à souder: Supports pour fers à souder; Pannes pour fers à souder
th: ฮาร์ดแวร์ > อุปกรณ์เครื่องมือ > อุปกรณ์หัวแร้ง: ที่วางหัวแร้ง; ปลายหัวแร้ง
el: Υλικά κατασκευών > Αξεσουάρ εργαλείων > Αξεσουάρ για συσκευές συγκόλλησης (κολλητήρια): Βάσεις για συσκευές συγκόλλησης (κολλητήρια); Άκρες για συσκευές συγκόλλησης (κολλητήρια)